Florida, session 2026, HB1237.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 468.3711, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
468.3711 Respiratory Care Interstate Compact Commission;
public meetings and public records exemptions.—
(1) A respiratory therapist's personal identifying
information, other than his or her name, licensure status, or
licensure number, obtained from the data system described in
Article VIII of s. 468.371 and held by the department or the
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1237-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1237 2026
board is exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the
State Constitution unless the state that originally reported the
information to the data system authorizes the disclosure of such
information by law. If disclosure is so authorized, such
information may be disclosed only to the extent authorized by
the law of the reporting state.
(2)(a) Any meeting or a portion of a meeting of the
Respiratory Care Interstate Compact Commission, the executive
committee, or other committee of the commission established in
Article VII of s. 468.371 at which matters specifically exempted
from disclosure by federal or state law are discussed is exempt
from s. 286.011 and s. 24(b), Art. I of the State Constitution.
(b) Recordings, minutes, and records generated during an
exempt meeting or exempt portion of a meeting are exempt from s.
119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution.
(3) This section is subject to the Open Government Sunset
Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and shall stand repealed
on October 2, 2031, unless reviewed and saved from repeal
through reenactment by the Legislature.
Section 2. (1) The Legislature finds that it is a public
necessity that a respiratory therapist's personal identifying
information, other than his or her name, licensure status, or
licensure number, obtained from the data system described in
Article VIII of s. 468.371, Florida Statutes, and held by the
Department of Health or the Board of Respiratory Care be made
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1237-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1237 2026
confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1), Florida Statutes, and
s. 24(a), Article I of the State Constitution. The personal
identifying information of a respiratory therapist should be
protected from public disclosure. Protection of such information
is required under the Respiratory Care Interstate Compact.
Without the public records exemption, this state will be unable
to effectively implement and administer the compact.
(2)(a) The Legislature further finds that it is a public
necessity that any meeting of the Respiratory Care Interstate
Compact Commission, or the executive committee or other
committee of the commission, as provided in s. 468.371, Florida
Statutes, at which matters specifically exempted from disclosure
by federal or state law are discussed be made exempt from s.
286.011, Florida Statutes, and s. 24(b), Article I of the State
Constitution.
(b) The Respiratory Care Interstate Compact requires the
closure of any meeting, or portion of a meeting, held by the
Respiratory Care Interstate Compact Commission, or the executive
committee or committees of the commission, if the presiding
officer announces in a public meeting that, in connection with
the performance of the commission's duties, the commission must
discuss certain sensitive and confidential subject matters. In
the absence of a public meetings exemption, this state would be
prohibited from becoming a member state of the compact.
(3) The Legislature further finds that it is a public
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1237-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1237 2026
necessity that the recordings, minutes, and records generated
during a meeting held as provided in s. 468.371, Florida
Statutes, which are exempt from public meetings requirements be
made exempt from s. 119.07(1), Florida Statutes, and s. 24(a),
Article I of the State Constitution. Release of such information
would negate the public meetings exemption. As such, the
Legislature finds that the public records exemption is a public
necessity.
Section 3. This act shall take effect on the same date
that HB 1235 or similar legislation takes effect, if such
legislation is adopted in the same legislative session or an
extension thereof and becomes a law.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1237-00